Hawaii statutes.
[§121-10.5] Prisoner of war and
missing in action designations. The State of Hawaii hereby recognizes the
designations of prisoner of war and missing in action as valid descriptions of
casualty status and category classification for military personnel. [L 2010, c
88, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next